lang/common/courses/twolc-lexc/eks_8.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+V +AI +Ind ! independent
+Prs +Prt
+1Sg +2Sg +3Sg +4Sg
+1Pl +12Pl +2Pl +3Pl +4Pl
@U.feature.value@
@U.perspref.NI@
@U.perspref.KI@
@U.perspref.NULL@
@U.tense.Prs@
@U.tense.Prt@
t2 %>
 
LEXICON Root
prefixes ;
nextstep;
content:content nextstep ;
uppercontent:lowercontent nextstep ;

LEXICON prefixes
@U.perspref.NI@:@U.perspref.NI@nit2 tns ;
@U.perspref.KI@:@U.perspref.KI@kit2 tns ;
@U.perspref.NULL@   tns ;

LEXICON tns
@U.tense.Prt@:@U.tense.Prt@kî- verbs ;
@U.tense.Prs@   verbs ;

LEXICON verbs
nipâw vai_tags ; ! and 5000 more...
akisow vai_tags ;

LEXICON vai_tags
@U.tense.Prs@+V+AI+Ind+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ vai_suf ;
@U.tense.Prt@+V+AI+Ind+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ vai_suf ;

LEXICON vai_suf
@U.perspref.NULL@+3Sg:@U.perspref.NULL@ # ;
@U.perspref.NI@+1Sg:@U.perspref.NI@%>n # ;
@U.perspref.KI@+2Sg:@U.perspref.KI@%>n # ;
@U.perspref.NULL@+4Sg:@U.perspref.NULL@%>yiwa # ;
@U.perspref.NULL@+4Pl:@U.perspref.NULL@%>yiwa # ;
@U.perspref.NI@+1Pl:@U.perspref.NI@%>nân # ;
@U.perspref.KI@+2Pl:@U.perspref.KI@%>nâwâw # ;
@U.perspref.NULL@+3Pl:@U.perspref.NULL@%>ak # ;
@U.perspref.KI@+12Pl:@U.perspref.KI@%>naw # ;
